Utah statutes.
34-29-14.   Dividing of fees prohibited.
Any employment agent sending out help to contractors or other employers of
help and dividing the fees allowed under this chapter with subcontractors and
employers of help, or their foremen or anyone in their employ, shall be
subject to the penalties provided in Section 34-29-15.
